Illinois, session 104th, SB2182.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Facility Fee Transparency and Prevention Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.8    "Facility fee" means any fee charged or billed by a health 9care facility, clinic, or hospital for operational expenses, 10separate from the fees charged by a health care provider for 11professional medical services.12    "Health care facility" means any hospital, clinic, or 13other entity providing medical care or health care services 14within the State.15    "Health care provider" means any individual licensed or 16certified to provide health care services in the State.17    "Hospital" has the meaning given to that term in the 18Hospital Licensing Act.19    "Preventive services" means (i) services defined as 20preventive care under the Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. 21300gg-13); (ii) evidence-based items or services that have a 22rating of "A" or "B" in the current recommendations of the 23United States Preventive Services Task Force; and (iii)   SB2182- 2 -LRB104 11166 BAB 21248 b1immunizations recommended by the Advisory Committee on 2Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and 3Prevention. 4    Section 10. Prohibition on facility fees for preventive 5services. No health care facility or health care provider 6shall charge or collect a facility fee for preventive services 7provided to a patient. This prohibition applies regardless of 8whether the patient's insurance covers the preventive service. 9    Section 15. Restrictions on facility fees for other 10services.11    (a) For any health care service other than preventive 12services, a health care facility may not charge or collect a 13facility fee not covered by the patient's insurance unless the 14patient is provided with written notice of the facility fee 7 15days prior to the scheduled service, or as soon as possible for 16unscheduled or emergency services.17    (b) The notice must include: 18        (1) the specific amount of the facility fee;19        (2) an explanation of the purpose of the facility fee;20        (3) a statement indicating whether the facility fee is 21    covered by the patient's insurance; and22        (4) contact information for the facility's billing 23    department.   SB2182- 3 -LRB104 11166 BAB 21248 b1    Section 20. Notification of new business relationships.2    (a) Health care facilities or health care providers must 3notify patients in writing of any new business relationship 4with, affiliation with, or acquisition by a hospital or health 5system.6    (b) The written notice must: 7        (1) be provided at least 30 days before the 8    implementation of any facility fees resulting from the new 9    business relationship;10        (2) include a clear explanation of the services 11    subject to facility fees, the expected amounts of those 12    fees, and whether these fees will be covered by insurance; 13    and14        (3) provide contact information for questions or 15    concerns regarding the new charges.16    (c) The written notice must be delivered by mail, 17electronic communication, or other method reasonably expected 18to reach the patient. 19    Section 25. The Facility Fee Reimbursement Fund. 20    (a) The Facility Fee Reimbursement Fund is hereby created 21as a special fund in the State treasury to help reimburse 22patients who have been charged facility fees that are not 23consistent with this Act.24    (b) Moneys in the Facility Fee Reimbursement Fund shall be 25used to:   SB2182- 4 -LRB104 11166 BAB 21248 b1        (1) reimburse patients who have provided sufficient 2    evidence to the Department that they were charged a 3    facility fee not in accordance with this Act; and4        (2) to cover any administrative costs related to 5    processing reimbursements.  6    Section 30. Enforcement and penalties.7    (a) The Department shall enforce this Act.8    (b) Any health care facility or health care provider that 9violates this Act shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to 10$2,500 per violation. All penalties collected under this Act 11shall be deposited into the Facility Fee Reimbursement Fund. 12    Section 35. Rulemaking. The Department shall have the 13authority to adopt rules and procedures to implement and 14enforce this Act.  15    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 16Section 5.1030 as follows: 17    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)18    Sec. 5.1030. The Facility Fee Reimbursement Fund. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 201, 2026.